Utah statutes.
4-37-102.   Purpose statement -- Aquaculture considered a branch of agriculture.

(1)  The Legislature declares that it is in the interest of the people of the state to encourage the practice of aquaculture, while protecting the public fishery resource, in order to augment food production, expand employment, promote economic development, and protect and better utilize the land and water resources of the state.

(2)  The Legislature further declares that aquaculture is considered a branch of the agricultural industry of the state for purposes of any laws that apply to or provide for the advancement, benefit, or protection of the agricultural industry within the state.

